Utah statutes.
70C-2-201.   Authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

A creditor or its successor in interest may not, directly or indirectly, take or receive from a debtor an obligation that constitutes or contains a cognovit or confession of judgment, warrant of attorney, or other waiver of the right to notice and the opportunity to be heard in the event of suit or process thereon.

